Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.01.570

Penalty for nonpayment of annual corporate license fees and failure to file a substantially complete annual report—Payment of delinquent fees—Rules.

In the event any domestic corporation fails to file a full and complete initial report under RCW 23.95.255, or in the event any corporation, foreign or domestic, does business in this state without having paid its annual corporate license fee and without having filed a substantially complete annual report under RCW 23.95.255 when either is due, there shall become due and owing the state of Washington a penalty as established by rule by the secretary under RCW 23.95.260.

A corporation organized under this title may at any time prior to its dissolution as provided in Article 6 of chapter 23.95 RCW, and a foreign corporation registered to do business in this state may at any time prior to the termination of its registration as provided in RCW 23.95.550, pay to the state of Washington its current annual license fee, provided it also pays an amount equal to all previously unpaid annual license fees plus the penalty established by rule by the secretary under RCW 23.95.260.

[ 2017 c 31 s 4; 2015 c 176 s 2111; 1994 c 287 s 6; 1991 c 72 s 30; 1989 c 165 s 23.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.